Utah statutes.
48-1d-104.   Governing law.

The internal affairs of a partnership and the liability of a partner as a partner for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the partnership are governed by:

(1)  in the case of a limited liability partnership, the law of this state; and

(2)  in the case of a partnership that is not a limited liability partnership, the law of the state of the jurisdiction in which the partnership has its principal office.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

